Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 08.62.157.
Duties of licensed pilots.

A person licensed under this chapter has a primary duty to safely navigate vessels under the pilot’s direction and control and to protect life and property and the marine environment while engaged in the provision of pilot services.

A person licensed under this chapter shall report to the appropriate authority all violations of a federal or state pilotage law.

History.

(§ 18 ch 89 SLA 1991)

Sec. 08.62.160.
Mandatory employment of licensed pilots.

A vessel subject to this chapter navigating the inland or coastal water of or adjacent to the state as determined by the board in regulation shall employ a pilot holding a valid license under this chapter. The board shall define the mandatory pilotage water of the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1970; am § 19 ch 89 SLA 1991)

Administrative Code. —

For compulsory pilotage waters, see 12 AAC 56, art. 2.

Sec. 08.62.163.
Pilots as independent contractors.

Pilots licensed under this chapter are independent contractors and may not be employed as an employee of the owner or operator of a vessel subject to this chapter.

The owner or operator of a vessel subject to this chapter may not employ a person licensed under this chapter as an employee.

History.

(§ 20 ch 89 SLA 1991)

Sec. 08.62.165.
Limitation of liability.

A pilot licensed under this chapter is not liable for damages in excess of $250,000 per incident for damages or loss occurring as a result of the error, omission, fault, or neglect of the pilot in performing pilotage services, except that the limitation does not apply in a case where

the pilot is either grossly negligent or guilty of wilful misconduct; or

the error, omission, fault, or neglect of the pilot constitutes an act for which the board shall impose a disciplinary sanction under AS

08.62.150(a)(2)

or (3).

Nothing in this section exempts a vessel, a vessel’s cargo, or the owner or operator of a vessel or cargo from liability for damage or loss caused by the vessel, the vessel’s cargo, or the owner or operator of the vessel or cargo to the vessel, the vessel’s cargo, another person, or other property on the ground that

the vessel was piloted by a pilot licensed under this chapter; or

the damage or loss occurred as a result of the error, omission, fault, or neglect of a pilot licensed under this chapter.

An organization of pilots is not liable for claims arising from acts or omissions of a pilot who is a member of the organization or for acts or omissions of another organization of pilots that relate to pilotage of a vessel. A pilot is not liable, directly or as a member of an organization of pilots, for claims arising from acts or omissions of another pilot or organization of pilots that relate to pilotage of a vessel. This subsection does not apply to acts or omissions relating to the ownership or operation of pilot boats or the transportation of pilots to and from a vessel to be piloted.

History.

(§ 20 ch 89 SLA 1991; am § 16 ch 74 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 56, art. 1.

Sec. 08.62.170.
Pilot’s lien for compensation.

Each vessel, its tackle, apparel, and furniture and the owner of the vessel are jointly and severally liable for the compensation of a pilot employed on the vessel and the pilot has a lien on the vessel, the vessel’s tackle, apparel, and furniture for the pilot’s compensation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1970)

Sec. 08.62.175.
Regional marine pilot organizations.

To the extent permitted under federal and state law, persons licensed under this chapter may form organizations of pilots within each pilotage region established by the board.

The board shall recognize pilot organizations that satisfy the minimum standards established by the board by regulation.

A pilot organization recognized by the board shall

promote a safe and reliable system of marine pilotage for the region in which the organization is recognized;

provide for the dispatch of pilots who are members of the organization;

adopt and revise rates for the provision of pilotage services not covered by an agreement under (e) of this section;

subject to the membership application and approval provisions contained in the articles and bylaws of the organization, be open to membership by all persons licensed under this chapter to pilot vessels in the pilotage region in which the organization is recognized;

operate or participate in a training program for pilots and deputy pilots that is approved by the board; a training program for deputy pilots may include a deputy marine pilot apprenticeship program approved by the board;

cooperate with and assist the board in implementing this chapter;

by February 1 of each year, submit a report to the board that includes information on the status of training and apprenticeship programs, the number of members of the pilot organization who are state residents, and other information requested by the board.

A pilot organization recognized by the board may not begin operating until the articles, bylaws, and rules of the pilot organization are approved by the board on the basis of

uniform and nondiscriminatory application of the articles, bylaws, and rules to marine pilots and deputy marine pilots licensed under this chapter and trainees for marine pilot licenses;

compliance with applicable laws; and

effectiveness in

promoting an efficient, reliable, and professional marine pilotage system in the region;

maintaining a sufficient number of qualified pilots available for dispatch to serve the needs of vessels visiting the region during each hour of the day and each day of the year to the extent that it is reasonably possible given the size of the membership of the pilot organization;

promoting training programs for marine pilots and deputy marine pilots that are approved by the board.

A pilot organization recognized by the board may enter into agreements with the master, owner, operator, or agent of a master, owner, or operator, of a vessel concerning the terms and conditions under which the pilot organization will provide pilotage services.

A pilot organization recognized by the board shall dispatch a person who is licensed under this chapter and who is a member of the organization to provide pilotage services upon the request of a representative of a vessel required to employ a pilot under AS

08.62.160

.

History.

(§ 21 ch 89 SLA 1991; am §§ 17, 18 ch 74 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 56, art. 1.

For recognition of pilot organizations, see 12 AAC 56, art. 4.

Sec. 08.62.180.
Exemptions.

This chapter does not apply to

vessels subject to federal pilot requirements under 46 U.S.C. 8502 except as provided in AS

08.62.185

;

fishing vessels, including fish processing and fish tender vessels, registered in the United States or in British Columbia, Canada;

vessels propelled by machinery and not more than 65 feet in length over deck, except tugboats and towboats propelled by steam;

vessels of United States registry of less than 300 gross tons and towboats of United States registry and vessels owned by the State of Alaska, engaged exclusively

on the rivers of Alaska; or

in the coastwise trade on the west or north coast of the United States including Alaska and Hawaii, and including British Columbia, Yukon Territory, and Northwest Territories, Canada;

vessels of Canada, built in Canada and manned by Canadian citizens, engaged in frequent trade between

British Columbia and Southeastern Alaska on the inside water of Southeastern Alaska south of 59 degrees, 29 minutes North latitude, if reciprocal exemptions are granted by Canada to vessels owned by the State of Alaska and those of United States registry; or

northern Alaska north of 68 degrees, 7 minutes North latitude and Yukon Territory or Northwest Territories;

pleasure craft of United States registry;

pleasure craft of foreign registry of 65 feet or less in overall length; and

vessels of the Canadian Navy or Canadian Coast Guard that have a home port in British Columbia, Canada, while navigating the inside water of Southeastern Alaska.

The operator of a pleasure craft of foreign registry of more than 65 feet overall length but less than 175 feet overall length may apply for an exemption from the pilotage requirement of this chapter. If an exemption is applied for and the fee prescribed under AS

08.62.140(b)

is paid, the board may issue the exemption to the operator of the vessel. The exemption is valid for one year from the date on which the exemption is issued. The application for an exemption must be submitted to the board at least 30 days before the vessel enters the state. The board shall approve or deny an application for the exemption within 10 working days after the application is received by the board. If the board does not approve or disapprove the application within 10 working days, the exemption is considered to be approved, and the board shall issue the exemption. The 10-day period for action by the board is suspended while the board is waiting for a response to a request by the board for additional information from the applicant. An exemption issued under this subsection may be revoked by the board if the vessel is not operated in a manner that is appropriate to protect human life, property, and the marine environment or if the vessel does not comply with all applicable local, state, and federal laws. The exemption must remain on the vessel while the vessel is in state water. An exemption issued under this subsection does not exempt a vessel from the requirement to employ a pilot licensed under this chapter while the vessel is in Wrangell Narrows or in the water between Chatham Strait and Sitka via Peril Strait.

The operator of a pleasure craft of foreign registry of more than 65 feet overall length but not more than 125 feet overall length that has received an exemption under (b) of this section shall proceed upon initial entry into state water to the first port of call to receive navigational and safety information from an agent registered under AS

08.62.040(a)(3)

who is employed by the operator of the vessel. The navigational and safety information provided by the agent must be approved by the marine pilot coordinator and annually reviewed, revised, and approved as appropriate by the board at its spring meeting.

The operator of a pleasure craft of foreign registry of more than 125 feet overall length but less than 175 feet overall length that has received an exemption under (b) of this section shall employ a pilot licensed under this chapter from initial entry into compulsory pilotage water of the state to the first port of call. The marine pilot shall provide navigational and safety information relating to the pilotage region to the operator of the vessel.

In (b) — (d) of this section,

“for hire” means for consideration contributed as a condition of carriage on a vessel, whether directly or indirectly flowing to the owner, charterer, operator, agent, or other person having an interest in the vessel;

“pleasure craft” means a vessel that does not carry passengers or freight for hire.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 43 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 78 SLA 1977; am § 9 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 22 ch 89 SLA 1991; am § 19 ch 74 SLA 1995; am § 3 ch 10 SLA 2003; am §§ 3, 4 ch 39 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For compulsory pilotage waters, see 12 AAC 56, art. 2.

Sec. 08.62.185.
Certain licensed pilots required for oil tankers.

Any oil tanker, whether enrolled or registered, of 50,000 dead weight tons or greater, shall, when navigating in state water beyond Alaska pilot stations employ a pilot licensed by the state under this chapter.

The pilot required in (a) of this section shall control the vessel during all docking operations.

History.

(§ 3 ch 78 SLA 1977; am § 23 ch 89 SLA 1991)

Sec. 08.62.187.
Registration of agents required.

A person may not act as an agent of a vessel subject to this chapter unless the person’s name appears on the register of agents kept under AS

08.62.040(a)(3)

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 143 SLA 1980)

Sec. 08.62.190.
Penalties.

A master or owner of a vessel required by this chapter to employ a licensed pilot who fails to do so when a licensed pilot is available, unless the perils or hazards of the sea prevent the employment of a pilot, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not less than $5,000 nor more than $15,000 for the first offense and not less than $10,000 nor more than $30,000 for the second offense.

A person who violates any other provision of this chapter or a regulation adopted under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not less than $1,000 nor more than $5,000.

For purposes of (a) of this section, the board shall define by regulation the phrase “when a licensed pilot is available.”

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 34 SLA 1979; am §§ 24, 25 ch 89 SLA 1991)

Administrative Code. —

For tariffs, see 12 AAC 56, art. 3.

Sec. 08.62.200.
[Renumbered as AS 08.62.900.]